lib/dict/pl_PL.aff
SET ISO8859-2
TRY aioeznrwcysptkmd³ulj±gbhê¶æó¿fñ¼vqxAIOEZNRWCYSPTKMD£ULJ¡GBHÊ¦ÆÓ¯FÑ¬VQX
WORDCHARS -

PFX b Y 1
PFX b   0         nie       .

SFX a Y 6
SFX a   e         ych       [^i]e
SFX a   e         ymi       [^i]e
SFX a   e         ym        [^i]e
SFX a   e         ch        ie
SFX a   e         m         ie
SFX a   e         mi        ie

SFX c Y 1
SFX c   i         u         i
